Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2829
Nonprescription drugs, defined.

Nonprescription drugs means nonnarcotic medicines or drugs which may be sold without a medical order and which are prepackaged for use by the consumer and labeled in accordance with the requirements of the laws and regulations of this state and the federal government.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 925.